Louisiana, session 2026, HB1210.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part III of Chapter 15 of Title 22 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 22:2351 through 2353, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART III. LOUISIANA RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY INSURANCE CATASTROPHIC
LOSS REVIEW AND RESOLUTION ACT
§2351. Short title
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana Residential
Property Insurance Catastrophic Loss Review and Resolution Act".
§2352. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms have the meanings ascribed to them:
(1) "Catastrophic loss" means a loss that arose from a natural disaster,
windstorm, or significant weather-related event that was a presidentially or
gubernatorially declared emergency or disaster.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1985 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1210
(2) "Claim dispute" means any disagreement between an insurer and an
insured regarding bad faith allegations for a catastrophic loss.
(3) "Department" means the Department of Insurance.
(4) "Residential property insurance" means insurance coverage for one-unit
to four-unit family dwellings.
(5) "Review panel" means an independent evaluator or panel assigned
pursuant to this Part.
§2353. Mandatory pre-suit review process; determination; legal effect; bad faith
exception; rulemaking authority
A.(1) An action for damages arising from a residential property shall not be
filed in any court of this state, unless the claimant has first complied with the pre-suit
review requirements of this Part.
(2) The claimant shall submit a notice of dispute to the department which
shall include all of the following:
(a) Satisfactory proof of loss.
(b) Estimates or supporting documentation.
(c) Summary of the dispute.
(3) The notice of dispute shall be submitted in a form and manner prescribed
by the department, including electronic submission.
(4) Within fifteen days of receipt of the notice of dispute, the insurer shall
provide to both the department and the claimant all of the following:
(a) A summary of its claim determination, including but not limited to any
of the following:
(i) Substantive and affirmative steps the insurer took to accumulate facts
about the loss.
(ii) Written offer to settle a claim and unconditionally tender a reasonable
amount by the insurer.
(iii) Payment to claimant within thirty days after written agreement or
settlement by the insurer.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1985 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1210
(b) Any other supporting documentation for the insurer's position.
(5)(a) All documentation shall be submitted electronically to the department
or in a form and manner prescribed by the department.
(b) The department shall acknowledge receipt of documentation
electronically or in a form and manner prescribed by the department.
(6) Claim adjudication shall be determined based solely on documentation
submitted to the department, without the necessity of a hearing.
(7) Failure of the insurer to provide the required documents within the
amount of time mandated by this Section shall result in a monetary fine of five
hundred dollars per day until the requisite documents are provided by the insurer.
B. Nothing in this Part shall relieve an insurer of the obligation to timely pay
undisputed amounts owed under the policy.
C.(1) An insurer shall not use the review process to delay payment of
undisputed amounts or to coerce settlement of disputed claims.
(2)(a) The department shall assign a neutral independent reviewer for claims
between twenty-five thousand dollars and one hundred thousand dollars or a panel
of three qualified reviewers for claims over one hundred thousand dollars.
(b) The neutral independent reviewer or review panel shall evaluate all
allegations or claims of bad faith.
(3) Reviewers shall be selected from a list maintained by the department and
include one of the following:
(a) A licensed adjuster.
(b) An engineer.
(c) A construction professional.
(4) Reviewers shall not have any financial or professional conflict of interest
in the dispute.
(5) The reviewers shall issue a written determination within thirty days of
assignment.
(6) The determination shall include all of the following:
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1985 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1210
(a) Findings of fact.
(b) Identification of disputed issues.
(c) Identification of disputed issues regarding bad faith allegations.
(7) The determination shall be admissible as evidence in any subsequent
legal proceeding and may be considered by the trier of fact but shall not be binding
and shall not create a presumption of liability upon either party.
(8) The department shall transmit the determination to both parties via
electronic means or certified mail.
D.(1) Participation in the review process shall not require either party to
accept a settlement and shall not have any adverse inference from a party's decision
to proceed to litigation.
(2) Costs of the review process shall be allocated as determined by the
department, provided that claimants shall not bear a disproportionate share of such
costs.
(3) Nothing in this Part shall prohibit a claimant from being represented by
counsel or a public adjuster during the review process.
E.(1) This Part does not apply to any of the following:
(a) Claims under twenty-five thousand dollars.
(b) Emergency actions requiring immediate judicial relief.
(2) This Part shall not prohibit an insured from undertaking reasonable and
necessary emergency repairs to prevent further damage, nor shall such actions
prejudice the insured's claim.
F. The prescriptive period applicable to a residential property insurance
claim shall be suspended from the date a notice of dispute is filed with the
department until the issuance of the review panel's determination.
G.(1) The department shall do all of the following:
(a) Establish a cost structure that minimizes financial burden on claimants,
which may include waivers or reduced fees based on financial hardship.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1985 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1210
(b) Promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to implement the
provisions of this Part.
(c) Provide plain-language guidance to claimants regarding the review
process, required documentation, and their rights pursuant to this Part.
(d) Publish annual data on outcomes of the review process, including
settlement rates and timelines.
(2) The department may establish an expedited review process for claims
involving habitability concerns or substantial structural damage.
H. The provisions of this Part shall not apply to a claimant, unless the court
finds that the claimant acted in bad faith or without reasonable basis.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.